Utah statutes.
63B-14-301.   Lease-purchase authorizations.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Mountainland Applied Technology Campus of the Utah College of Applied Technology may use existing funds to enter into a lease-purchase agreement for the development of an applied technology facility in Spanish Fork costing up to $3,250,000.

